Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-306
Zoning regulations;
conflict; stringent limitation or requirement prevails.

In
the event of any conflict between any airport zoning regulations adopted under the Airport Zoning Act and
any other regulations applicable to the same area, whether the conflict be
with respect to the height of structures or trees, the use of land, or any
other matter, and whether such other regulations were adopted by the political
subdivision which adopted the airport zoning regulations or by some other
political subdivision, the more stringent limitation or requirement shall
govern and prevail.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 4(2), p. 684;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 6.